Massachusetts, session 194th, H3603.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7A of Chapter 90 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition of the General Laws, is hereby amended by striking out in line 44 the word
“may” and inserting in place thereof the word “shall.”
SECTION 2. Said Section 7A of Chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding at the end of the fourth paragraph the following new text: - The registrar shall provide the
owner of a new motor vehicle subject to the inspection waiver, together with the certificate of
registration, with a decal to be affixed to the vehicle which contains the month of the next
required annual vehicle inspection. Any fee assessed by the Registry of Motor Vehicles for the
decal shall not exceed the amount charged for the annual emissions testing and safety program.
of 2

The waiver for the initial annual inspection of new vehicles shall not be applicable to the
inspection of all buses and transportation network vehicles pursuant to this chapter.
of 2